Louisiana, session 2026, SB75.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 29:726(E)(31) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§726. Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness;
authority and responsibilities
* * *
E. The office shall either directly or through authorized assignment to another
state agency or department:
* * *
(31) Promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act establishing cybersecurity standards applicable to local governmental
subdivisions and political subdivisions that seek state assistance in response to
a cybersecurity incident.
(a) The rules shall at a minimum establish cybersecurity standards for
technical management practices that assure cybersecurity compliance with
national cybersecurity standards and set forth eligibility requirements for
receiving state assistance in response to a cybersecurity incident.
(b) Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to prevent the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness from
entering into a contract to provide services to a local governmental subdivision
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 75 ENROLLED
or political subdivision that is not in compliance with the cybersecurity
standards promulgated pursuant to this Paragraph. Reimbursement of costs
associated with these services shall be the obligation of the noncompliant local
governmental subdivision or political subdivision.
(c) The office may promulgate emergency rules to provide for the initial
implementation of the provisions of this Paragraph.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.